Washington statutes.
RCW 35.98.010

Continuation of existing law.

The provisions of this title insofar as they are substantially the same as statutory provisions repealed by this chapter, and relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations, and not as new enactments.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.98.010.]